Hawaii statutes.
[PART XII.]
ASSISTING DAM AND RESERVOIR OWNERS

Note

This part was enacted by Act 147 (2012). Section 3 of Act
147 provides:

"SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2012,
and upon ratification of constitutional amendments [sic] authorizing the State
to issue special purpose revenue bonds and use the proceeds from the bonds to
assist dam and reservoir owners."

Although House Bill No. 2594 (2012) proposed an amendment to
article VII, §12 of the state constitution to authorize the State to issue
special purpose revenue bonds and use the proceeds from the bonds to assist dam
and reservoir owners, that constitutional amendment was not ratified in the
2012 election. However, in 2014, Senate Bill No. 2876 proposed an amendment to
the same article and section of the state constitution to similarly authorize
the State to issue special purpose revenue bonds and use the proceeds from the
bonds to assist dam and reservoir owners. That constitutional amendment was
ratified in the 2014 election.

[§39A-341] Definitions. Whenever used
in this part, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

"Appurtenant works" shall have the
same meaning in this part as it has in section 179D-3.

"Dam" shall have the same meaning in
this part as it has in section 179D-3.

"Department" means the department of
budget and finance.

"Owner" means any person subject to
chapter 179D who has a right, title, or interest in or to the dam or reservoir
or to the property upon which the dam, reservoir, or appurtenant works are
located or proposed to be located.

"Person" or "persons" means
an individual, firm, enterprise, partnership, corporation, association,
cooperative or other legal entity, governmental body or agency, board, bureau
or other instrumentality thereof, or any combination of the foregoing.

"Project" means any work on a dam,
reservoir, or appurtenant works necessary to maintain or improve the dam,
reservoir, or appurtenant works.

"Project agreement" means any
agreement entered into under this part by the department with a project party
to finance, construct, operate, or maintain a project from the proceeds of
special purpose revenue bonds, or to lend the proceeds of special purpose
revenue bonds to assist dam and reservoir owners, including without limitation
any loan agreement.

"Project party" means a person or
persons who are dam and reservoir owners.

"Reservoir" shall have the same
meaning in this part as it has in section 179D-3.

"Special purpose revenue bonds" or
"bonds" means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of the
State issued pursuant to this part. [L 2012, c 147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next